Mississippi, session 2026, HB4138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Lamar Sampson of Humphreys County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crimes of Arson and Conspiracy to Commit Arson on February 27, 2013, in Humphreys County, for which he was sentenced to serve three (3) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections suspended, and two (2) years under supervised probation. He was released on probation on April 25, 2013, and discharged on April 13, 2015.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.